North Carolina, session 2025, HB1186.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Establishment. – The North Carolina Collaboratory (Collaboratory)
shall establish and implement a pilot program to support law enforcement, improve controlled
substance investigations, and reduce the risk of false arrests by providing participating law
enforcement agencies with new field drug-detecting technology and measuring the impact of that
technology on all of the following:
*H1186-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Case clearance.
(2) Law enforcement officer safety.
(3) Controlled substance testing accuracy.
(4) Identifying new or novel substances.
(5) Drug organization investigations.
(6) Cost-effectiveness.
SECTION 2. Program Requirements. – The pilot program required by this act shall
do, at a minimum, all of the following:
(1) Provide participating law enforcement agencies with drug-detection devices
meeting the requirements set forth in this subdivision to use in place of
color-based field drug tests for detecting suspected controlled substances.
Drug-detection devices provided under the pilot program shall meet all of the
following requirements:
a. Be portable or field-deployable.
b. Does not use, depend on, or interpret any visible color change or
visually observed chemical reaction as the primary basis for controlled
substance identification, such as reagent pouches, spot tests, test strips,
crystal or precipitate formation, and technology-assisted interpretation
of a color reaction. Drug-detection device indicators such as indicator
lights or interface colors are not disqualifying under this
sub-subdivision.
c. Shall generate and electronically retain a digital analytical signature of
the sample sufficient for independent audit and program evaluation.
d. Shall compare the analytical signature to an updatable electronic
reference library to generate an objective identification result, and
shall indicate "no match/unknown," or an equivalent indicator, when
no acceptable match is found.
e. Shall include a reference library that is capable of being updated on a
recurring basis to incorporate new and emerging controlled
substances.
f. Shall record, at a minimum, the result, the associated analytical
signature, the date and time, and a device identifier.
g. Shall support evaluator access to test records and underlying
signatures sufficient for independent audit and program evaluation.
(2) Use both quantitative and qualitative methods to address all of the following
research questions related to use of a drug-detection device provided under
the pilot program:
a. Does access to a drug-detection device change drug enforcement and
case processing outcomes, including arrests and charges, case time
lines, dispositions, and sentences?
b. Do "no controlled substance" (NCS) outcomes, such as lab-confirmed
negatives, change after implementation?
c. How does the technology affect officer workload, safety practices,
evidentiary workflows, and the work of prosecutors and defense
counsel?
d. Do impacts differ by race or ethnicity, geography, or offense type?
e. Any other questions determined relevant by the Collaboratory.
(3) Leverage available data from State agencies deemed relevant by the
Collaboratory to track case-level outcomes across jurisdictions over time.
(4) Measure (i) drug enforcement and case processing outcomes, including arrest
and charging activity, case resolution time lines, and case dispositions and (ii)
Page 2 House Bill 1186-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
forensic laboratory system impacts, including effects on submission volume,
processing time lines, and confirmation outcomes.
(5) Employ appropriate quantitative methods to compare outcomes in pilot
program jurisdictions to comparable non-pilot program jurisdictions before
and after deployment of the drug-detection devices, using research designs
adequate to support causal inference to the extent feasible given available
data. The specific methods, including selection of comparison groups and
outcome measures, shall be determined by the Collaboratory.
(6) Conduct qualitative inquiry in pilot program sites using methods appropriate
to the research questions, which may include interviews, focus groups, and
workflow observations. Participants may include law enforcement personnel,
prosecutors, defense counsel, and other stakeholders the Collaboratory
determines have relevant experience. The Collaboratory shall determine the
specific qualitative design, participant selection, and inquiry domains.
SECTION 3. Use of Third Parties. – In establishing and implementing the pilot
program required under Section 1 of this act, the Collaboratory shall consult with persons or
entities the Collaboratory deems to be subject matter experts in drug detection, law enforcement,
and public policy. Additionally, the Collaboratory may collaborate with any person or entity that
the Collaboratory deems appropriate to assist in establishing and implementing the pilot program
required by this act. Any person or entity utilized by the Collaboratory under the authority set
forth in this section shall have the same access to data and cooperation provided to the
Collaboratory under Section 4 of this act.
SECTION 4. Data Access and Cooperation. – State agencies that maintain data
determined by the Collaboratory to be relevant to the pilot program required by this act, including
the Administrative Office of the Courts and the North Carolina State Crime Laboratory, shall
make available to the Collaboratory such data as the Collaboratory deems may be reasonably
necessary to conduct the pilot program, to the extent permitted by applicable State and federal
law and subject to appropriate privacy protections and data use agreements. A State agency that
is requested to provide assistance to the Collaboratory in performing its duties shall assist the
Collaboratory, to the extent the assistance provided by the State agency is consistent with its
duties under the law. As a condition of participation in the pilot program, participating law
enforcement agencies shall cooperate with the Collaboratory in the conduct of the pilot program,
including by making relevant personnel available for interview and providing access to
operational documents and records related to the pilot program. Nothing in this section shall
require the disclosure of information that would compromise an ongoing investigation, reveal a
confidential informant, or is otherwise confidential or privileged under State or federal law.
SECTION 5. Participating Law Enforcement Agencies. – The Collaboratory shall
select the law enforcement agencies who will participate in the pilot program required by this
act. The Collaboratory shall ensure that the law enforcement agencies it selects are representative
of law enforcement throughout the State, including agencies from rural and urban areas of the
State and agencies that would allow for analysis of data from the I-85 and I-95 drug-trafficking
corridors.
SECTION 6. Reports. – The Collaboratory shall provide all of the following reports
to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Fiscal Research
Division:
(1) Beginning three months from the effective date of this act, and every three
months thereafter, an interim report providing updates on the establishment
and implementation of the pilot program required by this act.
(2) By no later than two years from the date the Collaboratory receives the funds
appropriated in Section 7 of this act, a final report detailing the findings of the
pilot program and any data deemed relevant by the Collaboratory.
House Bill 1186-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7. Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Collaboratory the sum of one million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,750,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for costs related to the development
and implementation of the pilot program required by this act, including purchasing equipment
and adding any additional staffing. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any
funds remaining unspent or unencumbered at the end of the 2026-2027 fiscal year shall not revert
but shall remain available to spend until the pilot program expires.
SECTION 8. Definition and Construction. – For purposes of this act, the term
"drug-detection device" means a device designed to detect the presence of controlled substances
and not impairment of nor consumption by a person. Nothing in this act shall be construed as
altering or otherwise affecting (i) the standard of proof required for arrest or conviction under
current law or (ii) the types of drug tests currently admissible in a court of law.
SECTION 9. Effective Date and Expiration. – Section 7 of this act becomes effective
July 1, 2026. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law. The pilot program
required by this act shall expire on the earlier of the date the final report required under Section
6 of this act is provided or December 1, 2028.
Page 4 House Bill 1186-First Edition